District of Columbia statutes.
4-1302.04

Release of information for research and evaluation.

The staff which maintains the Child Protection Register may release information from said Register for research and evaluation only upon an order of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia; provided, however, that no information identifying the persons named in a report shall be made available to the researcher or evaluator.

History

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title II, § 204, 24 DCR 3341

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-1302.03 and § 4-1303.06.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2114.
1973 Ed., § 6-2114.